Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 7. Fishways and Hatcheries.

Sec. 16.05.841.
Fishway required.

If the commissioner considers it necessary, every dam or other obstruction built by any person across a stream frequented by salmon or other fish shall be provided by that person with a durable and efficient fishway and a device for efficient passage for downstream migrants. The fishway or device or both shall be maintained in a practical and effective manner in the place, form, and capacity the commissioner approves for which plans and specifications shall be approved by the department upon application. The fishway or device shall be kept open, unobstructed, and supplied with a sufficient quantity of water to admit freely the passage of fish through it.

History.

(E.O. No. 114 § 2 (2008))

Cross references. —

See also AS

16.10.010

—

16.10.050

.

Administrative Code. —

For fish habitat, see 5 AAC 95, art. 1.

Sec. 16.05.850.
Hatchery required. [Repealed, E.O. No. 107, § 44 (2003).]

Sec. 16.05.851.
Hatchery required.

If a fishway over a dam or obstruction is considered impracticable by the commissioner because of cost, the owner of the dam or obstruction, in order to compensate for the loss resulting from the dam or obstruction shall, at the owner’s option

pay a lump sum acceptable to the commissioner to the state fish and game fund;

convey to the state a site of a size satisfactory to the commissioner at a place mutually satisfactory to both parties, and erect on it a fish hatchery, rearing ponds, necessary buildings, and other facilities according to plans and specifications furnished by the commissioner, and give a good and sufficient bond to furnish water, lights, and necessary money to operate and maintain the hatchery and rearing ponds; or

enter into an agreement with the commissioner, secured by good and sufficient bond, to pay to the fish and game fund the initial amount of money and annual payments thereafter that the commissioner considers necessary to expand, maintain, and operate additional facilities at existing hatcheries within a reasonable distance of the dam or obstruction.

History.

(E.O. No. 114 § 2 (2008))

Sec. 16.05.860.
Penalty for violating fishway and hatchery requirements. [Repealed, E.O. No. 107, § 44 (2003).]

Sec. 16.05.861.
Penalty for violating fishway and hatchery requirements.

The owner of a dam or obstruction who fails to comply with AS

16.05.841

or

16.05.851

or a regulation adopted under AS

16.05.841

or

16.05.851

within a reasonable time specified by written notice from the commissioner is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000. Each day the owner fails to comply constitutes a separate offense.

In addition to the fine, the dam or other obstruction managed, controlled, or owned by a person violating AS

16.05.841

or

16.05.851

or a regulation adopted under AS

16.05.841

or

16.05.851

is a public nuisance and is subject to abatement.

History.

(E.O. No. 114 § 2 (2008))